test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_aarran_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - aarrân: # ok 1B v-g, VVCC > VC, C > C1
    aarrân+N+Sg+Nom: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Gen: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Acc: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Ill: aṛânân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Loc: aṛânist
    aarrân+N+Sg+Com: aṛânáin
    aarrân+N+Sg+Abe: aarrânttáá
    aarrân+N+Ess: aṛânin
    aarrân+N+Par: aṛânid
    aarrân+N+Pl+Nom: aṛâneh
    aarrân+N+Pl+Gen: aṛânij
    aarrân+N+Pl+Acc: aṛânijd
    aarrân+N+Pl+Ill: aṛânáid
    aarrân+N+Pl+Loc: aṛânijn
    aarrân+N+Pl+Com: aṛânijguin
    aarrân+N+Pl+Abe: aṛânijttáá

  Noun - čäällim: # ok 1B v-g, ääll-›äl
    čäällim+N+Sg+Nom: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Gen: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Acc: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Ill: čäḷimân
    čäällim+N+Sg+Loc: čäḷimist
    čäällim+N+Sg+Com: čäḷimáin
    čäällim+N+Sg+Abe: čäällimttáá
    čäällim+N+Ess: čäḷimin
    čäällim+N+Par: čäḷimid
    čäällim+N+Pl+Nom: čäḷimeh
    čäällim+N+Pl+Gen: čäḷimij
    čäällim+N+Pl+Acc: čäḷimijd
    čäällim+N+Pl+Ill: čäḷimáid
    čäällim+N+Pl+Loc: čäḷimijn
    čäällim+N+Pl+Com: čäḷimijguin
    čäällim+N+Pl+Abe: čäḷimijttáá
    
  Noun - viettâr: # ok 1B
    viettâr+N+Sg+Nom: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Gen: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Acc: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Ill: vieˊtârân
    viettâr+N+Sg+Loc: vieˊtârist
    viettâr+N+Sg+Com: vieˊtâráin
    viettâr+N+Sg+Abe: viettârttáá
    viettâr+N+Ess: vieˊtârin 
    viettâr+N+Par: vieˊtârid 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Nom: vieˊtâreh
    viettâr+N+Pl+Gen: vieˊtârij
    viettâr+N+Pl+Acc: vieˊtârijd 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Ill: vieˊtâráid 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Loc: vieˊtârijn 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Com: vieˊtârijguin
    viettâr+N+Pl+Abe: vieˊtârijttáá

  Noun - čiermih: # ok 1B d-kk,  rm-ˊrm
    čiermih+N+Sg+Nom: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Gen: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Acc: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Ill: čieˊrmihân
    čiermih+N+Sg+Loc: čieˊrmihist
    čiermih+N+Sg+Com: čieˊrmiháin
    čiermih+N+Sg+Abe: čiermihttáá
    čiermih+N+Ess: čieˊrmihin
    čiermih+N+Par: čieˊrmihid
    čiermih+N+Pl+Nom: čieˊrmiheh
    čiermih+N+Pl+Gen: čieˊrmihij
    čiermih+N+Pl+Acc: čieˊrmihijd
    čiermih+N+Pl+Ill: čieˊrmiháid
    čiermih+N+Pl+Loc: čieˊrmihijn
    čiermih+N+Pl+Com: čieˊrmihijguin
    čiermih+N+Pl+Abe: čieˊrmihijttáá


  Noun - eehid: # ok
    eehid+N+Sg+Nom: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Gen: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Acc: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Ill: ehidân
    eehid+N+Sg+Loc: ehidist
    eehid+N+Sg+Com: ehidáin
    eehid+N+Sg+Abe: eehidttáá
    eehid+N+Ess: ehidin
    eehid+N+Par: ehidid
    eehid+N+Pl+Nom: ehideh
    eehid+N+Pl+Gen: ehidij
    eehid+N+Pl+Acc: ehidijd
    eehid+N+Pl+Ill: ehidáid
    eehid+N+Pl+Loc: ehidijn
    eehid+N+Pl+Com: ehidijguin
    eehid+N+Pl+Abe: ehidijttáá

  Noun - juuhâm: # ok
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Nom: juuhâm
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Gen: juuhâm
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Acc: juuhâm
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Ill: juhâmân
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Loc: juhâmist
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Com: juhâmáin
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Abe: juuhâmttáá
    juuhâm+N+Ess: juhâmin
    juuhâm+N+Par: juhâmid
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Nom: juhâmeh
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Gen: juhâmij
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Acc: juhâmijd
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Ill: juhâmáid
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Loc: juhâmijn
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Com: juhâmijguin
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Abe: juhâmijttáá

  Noun - šoohâd: # ok
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Nom: šoohâd
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Gen: šoohâd
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Acc: šoohâd
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Ill: šohâdân
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Loc: šohâdist
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Com: šohâdáin
    šoohâd+N+Sg+Abe: šoohâdttáá
    šoohâd+N+Ess: šohâdin
    šoohâd+N+Par: šohâdid
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Nom: šohâdeh
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Gen: šohâdij
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Acc: šohâdijd
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Ill: šohâdáid
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Loc: šohâdijn
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Com: šohâdijguin
    šoohâd+N+Pl+Abe: šohâdijttáá

  Noun - maađij: # ok
    maađij+N+Sg+Nom: maađij
    maađij+N+Sg+Gen: maađij
    maađij+N+Sg+Acc: maađij
    maađij+N+Sg+Ill: mađijân
    maađij+N+Sg+Loc: mađijist
    maađij+N+Sg+Com: mađijáin
    maađij+N+Sg+Abe: maađijttáá
    maađij+N+Ess: mađijin
    maađij+N+Par: mađijid
    maađij+N+Pl+Nom: mađijeh
    maađij+N+Pl+Gen: mađijij
    maađij+N+Pl+Acc: mađijijd
    maađij+N+Pl+Ill: mađijáid
    maađij+N+Pl+Loc: mađijijn
    maađij+N+Pl+Com: mađijijguin
    maađij+N+Pl+Abe: mađijijttáá

  Noun - suohâd: # ok
    suohâd+N+Sg+Nom: suohâd
    suohâd+N+Sg+Gen: suohâd
    suohâd+N+Sg+Acc: suohâd
    suohâd+N+Sg+Ill: suoˊhâdân
    suohâd+N+Sg+Loc: suoˊhâdist
    suohâd+N+Sg+Com: suoˊhâdáin
    suohâd+N+Sg+Abe: suohâdttáá
    suohâd+N+Ess: suoˊhâdin
    suohâd+N+Par: suoˊhâdid
    suohâd+N+Pl+Nom: suoˊhâdeh
    suohâd+N+Pl+Gen: suoˊhâdij
    suohâd+N+Pl+Acc: suoˊhâdijd
    suohâd+N+Pl+Ill: suoˊhâdáid
    suohâd+N+Pl+Loc: suoˊhâdijn
    suohâd+N+Pl+Com: suoˊhâdijguin
    suohâd+N+Pl+Abe: suoˊhâdijttáá

  Noun - čuoivâg: # 1B
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Nom: čuoivâg
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Gen: čuoivâg
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Acc: čuoivâg
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Ill: čuoˊivâgân
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Loc: čuoˊivâgist
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Com: čuoˊivâgáin
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Abe: čuoivâgttáá
    čuoivâg+N+Ess: čuoˊivâgin
    čuoivâg+N+Par: čuoˊivâgid
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Nom: čuoˊivâgeh
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Gen: čuoˊivâgij
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Acc: čuoˊivâgijd
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Ill: čuoˊivâgáid
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Loc: čuoˊivâgijn
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Com: čuoˊivâgijguin
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Abe: čuoˊivâgijttáá
